Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
68-1906
Gross inpatient revenue, defined.

Gross inpatient
revenue means the revenue paid to a nursing facility or skilled nursing facility
for inpatient resident care, room, board, and services less contractual adjustments,
bad debt, and revenue from sources other than operations, including, but not
limited to, interest, guest meals, gifts, and grants.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 6.